Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1621
Judgments against public corporations; special tax levy; how collected.

The tax shall be levied upon all the taxable property in the district, county, township, town or city bound by the judgment, and shall be collected in the same manner and at the same time provided by law for the collection of other taxes.

Laws 1867 (Ter.), § 3, p. 13;

R.S.1913, § 6466;

C.S.1922, § 5989;

C.S.1929, § 77-1811;

R.S.1943, § 77-1621.